src/fst/stems/interjections.lexc
LEXICON INTERJ_
+Interj: # ;

LEXICON Interjection
!! FROM APERTIUM
ach:ach INTERJ_ ;
ah:ah INTERJ_ ;
äh:äh INTERJ_ ;
aha:aha INTERJ_ ;
ähm:ähm INTERJ_ ;
au:au INTERJ_ ;
aua:aua INTERJ_ ;
autsch:autsch INTERJ_ ;
bum:bum INTERJ_ ;
Donnerwetter:Donnerwetter INTERJ_ ;
ha:ha INTERJ_ ;
hallo:hallo INTERJ_ ;
he:he INTERJ_ ;
hm:hm INTERJ_ ;
hoppla:hoppla INTERJ_ ;
hurra:hurra INTERJ_ ;
naja:naja INTERJ_ ;
oh:oh INTERJ_ ;
OK:OK INTERJ_ ;
okay:okay INTERJ_ ;
pfui:pfui INTERJ_ ;
prost:prost INTERJ_ ;
pst:pst INTERJ_ ;
puh:puh INTERJ_ ;
tja:tja INTERJ_ ;
tschüs:tschüs INTERJ_ ;
tschüss:tschüss INTERJ_ ;
Wau:Wau INTERJ_ ;
wau-wau:wau-wau INTERJ_ ;

!!MWE
auf% Wiedersehen:auf% Wiedersehen INTERJ_ ;
bitte% schön:bitte% schön INTERJ_ ;
guten% Morgen:guten% Morgen INTERJ_ ;
in% Ordnung:in% Ordnung INTERJ_ ;
nicht% wahr:nicht% wahr INTERJ_ ;
vielen% Dank:vielen% Dank INTERJ_ ;
zum% Wohl:zum% Wohl INTERJ_ ;
